Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-32,114
Uncovered expenditures, defined.

Uncovered expenditures shall mean the costs to the health maintenance organization for health care services that are the obligation of the health maintenance organization for which an enrollee may also be liable in the event of the health maintenance organization's insolvency and for which no alternative arrangements have been made that are acceptable to the director.

Laws 1990, LB 1136, § 23.